District of Columbia statutes.
42-2020

Authority to obtain hazard insurance; held in trust; no effect on right to insure individual unit.

The manager or the board of directors, if required by the bylaws or by a majority of the co-owners, or at the request of a mortgagee having a first mortgage of record covering a unit, shall have the authority to, and shall, obtain insurance for the property against loss or damage by fire and such other hazards under such terms and for such amounts as shall be required or requested. Such insurance coverage shall be written on the property in the name of such manager or of the board of directors of the council of co-owners, as trustee for each of the unit owners in the percentages established in the declaration. Premiums shall be common expenses. Provision for such insurance shall be without prejudice to the right of each unit owner to insure his own unit for his benefit.

Dec. 21, 1963, 77 Stat. 458, Pub. L. 88-218, § 20
Supersedure of chapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-2001.
1973 Ed., § 5-920.
1981 Ed., § 45-1720.